Utah statutes.
76-8-513.   False judicial or official notice.

A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor who, with a purpose to procure the compliance of another with a request made by the person, knowingly sends, mails, or delivers to the person a notice or other writing which has no judicial or other sanction but which in its format or appearance simulates a summons, complaint, court order, or process, or an insignia, seal, or printed form of a federal, state, or local government or an instrumentality thereof, or is otherwise calculated to induce a belief that it does have a judicial or other official sanction.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

